Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2193.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5385YH (3) 91 nls/ko H.F. 2193 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 511.41 Living organ donors. 1 1. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise 2 requires: 3 a. âCovered personâ means a policyholder, subscriber, 4 enrollee, or other individual participating in a policy. 5 b. âInsurerâ means a person to whom the commissioner of 6 insurance has issued a limited lines life insurance, disability 7 insurance, or long-term care insurance producer license. 8 c. âLiving organ donorâ means an individual who is not 9 deceased and who has donated all or part of an organ. 10 d. âPolicyâ means a life insurance policy, disability 11 insurance policy, or long-term care insurance policy. 12 2. An insurer shall not, based solely on an individualâs 13 status as a living organ donor, do any of the following: 14 a. Decline or limit coverage under a policy for a covered 15 person that is a living organ donor. 16 b. As a condition of continued coverage under a policy, 17 preclude a covered person from becoming a living organ donor. 18 c. Discriminate against a covered person or individual in 19 the offering, issuance, cancellation, coverage amount, price, 20 or any other condition of a policy on the sole basis that the 21 covered person or individual is a living organ donor. 22 3. The commissioner of insurance shall adopt rules pursuant 23 to chapter 17A to administer this section. 24